Connecticut, session 2026, HB05493.
Be it enacted by the Senate and House of Representatives in General
Assembly convened:
Section 1. (Effective from passage) The Comptroller shall study the
feasibility and cost of establishing a program to provide stipends to
members of the civil air patrol, as defined in section 28-17a of the general
statutes, when such members are absent from work for the purpose of
(1) responding as a member of the civil air patrol to an emergency
declared by the Governor of this state or the President of the United
States, (2) responding as a member of the civil air patrol to a request for
assistance in an emergency, natural disaster or life-threatening event at
the request of the United States Air Force or Coast Guard, the
Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection, the Division
of Emergency Management and Homeland Security within the
Department of Emergency Services and Public Protection, the state
police or a local police department in this state, or (3) participating as a
member of the civil air patrol in required emergency services training
programs and exercises. Not later than January 1, 2027, the Comptroller
shall submit a report on the results of such study, in accordance with the
provisions of section 11-4a of the general statutes, to the joint standing
committee of the General Assembly having cognizance of matters
relating to labor and public employees.

House Bill No. 5493
Governor's Action:
Approved June 2, 2026
Special Act No. 26-31 2 of 2